Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39D Continuity of Government

39D.010.
Temporary seat of state government — Acts valid and binding.

When, during a state of emergency, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of state government at the state capital, the Governor shall, as often as the exigencies of the situation require, by proclamation, designate a temporary location for the seat of government at the place within this Commonwealth deemed advisable, and shall take action and issue orders necessary for an orderly transition of the affairs of state government to the temporary location. If practicable, the temporary location designated by the Governor shall conform to that provided for in the current Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan. The temporary location shall remain as the seat of government until the Governor establishes a new location under this section, or until the emergency is ended and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

While the seat of government remains at the temporary location, all official acts required by law to be performed at the seat of government by any officer, independent agency, division, or authority of this Commonwealth, including the convening and meeting of the General Assembly in regular or special session, shall be as valid and binding when performed at that temporary location as if performed at the normal location.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 52, effective July 15, 1998.

39D.020.
Designation of alternate or substitute places for local government — Acts valid and binding.

When, during a state of emergency, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual places, the governing body of each county, urban-county, charter county, and city of this Commonwealth may meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of that political subdivision, at the direction of the elected chief executive officer or his or her successor, and shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, resolution, or other manner, alternate or substitute places as the temporary locations of government where all, or any part, of the public business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency situation. The alternate or substitute places may be within or without the territorial limits of the county, urban-county, charter county, and city, and shall be within those of the state. If practicable, they shall be the places designated as the temporary locations of government in the current local emergency operations plan.

While the public business is being conducted at a temporary location, the governing body and other officers of a county, urban-county, charter county, and city of this Commonwealth shall have and exercise, at that location, all of the executive, legislative, administrative, and judicial powers and functions conferred upon that body and officers under state law. The powers and functions, except judicial, may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to or compliance with time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining thereto. All acts of the body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their county, urban-county, charter county and city.

This section shall control notwithstanding any statutory charter or ordinance provision to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 53, effective July 15, 1998.

39D.030.
Ordinances and resolutions for continuity of government.

The governing body of each county, urban-county government, charter county government, and city shall enact the ordinances and resolutions necessary to provide for the continuity of government throughout the duration of a state of emergency. The ordinances and resolutions shall provide a method by which temporary emergency appointments to public office are made, except as limited by express constitutional provisions, and shall define the scope of the powers and duties which may be exercised, and provide for termination of the appointment so made. This section shall control notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 54, effective July 15, 1998.

39D.040.
Emergency interim successors — Order of successions — Vacancies — Applicability of statute to all special districts and political subdivisions.

As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Emergency interim successor” means a person designated under this section, if an officer is unavailable, to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of that office until a successor is appointed or elected and qualified as provided by law, or until the lawful incumbent is able to resume the exercise of the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

“Office” includes all state and local offices, the powers and duties of which are defined by law, except the office of Governor, and except those in the General Assembly and the judiciary. An “officer” is a person who holds an office.

“Political subdivision” includes counties, urban-counties, charter counties, cities, special districts, authorities, and other public corporations and entities whether organized and existing under charter or general law.

“Unavailable” means that during a state of emergency either:

A vacancy in office exists and there is no deputy authorized to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of the office; or

That the lawful incumbent of the office and any duly authorized deputy are absent or unable to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

Subject to administrative regulations of the Governor, all state officers, shall, in addition to any deputy authorized to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of the office, designate by title emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession. The officer shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this section to ensure their current status. The officer shall designate a sufficient number of emergency interim successors so that there will be not fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) deputies or emergency interim successors or any combination thereof, at any time. If any state officer is unavailable following an emergency, and if a deputy, if any, is also unavailable, the powers of office shall be exercised and the duties of office shall be discharged by any designated emergency interim successors in the order specified. The emergency interim successors shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties only until such time as the Governor under the Constitution or authority other than this section, or other official authorized under the Constitution or this section to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office of Governor has, where a vacancy exists, appointed a successor to fill the vacancy, or until a successor is otherwise appointed, or elected and qualified as provided by law, or until an officer or any deputy or a preceding named emergency interim successor becomes available to exercise, or resume the exercise and discharge of, the powers and duties of the office.

Each cabinet and each department of state government, and each agency of state government shall appoint not fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) emergency interim successors for each position specified in the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan and the internal emergency operations procedures for that department or agency. Emergency interim successors in the order of the succession shall have the full power to exercise all powers of their department or agency and to commit its resources during a time of emergency or disaster if the person normally exercising the position becomes unavailable. If the preceding emergency successor becomes unavailable he or she shall resume all duties from the emergency interim successor, unless he or she chooses to permit the emergency interim successor to remain in the position until relieved.

The local legislative bodies of cities, counties, urban-counties, and charter counties shall enact ordinances or orders governing the manner in which vacancies in offices and employment shall be filled, and for the prompt filling thereof during times of disaster and emergency, if the filling of these vacancies is not otherwise provided for by law. The legislative bodies shall enact ordinances providing for the appointment of not fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) emergency interim successors for each local office, department, and agency specified in the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan and local emergency operations plans and annexes thereto. Emergency interim successors, in the order of their successions, shall have the full power to exercise all powers of the office, department, or agency and to commit its resources during a time of emergency or disaster if the person normally exercising the position is unavailable. If the preceding emergency successor becomes available, he or she shall resume the duties being performed by the emergency interim successor, unless he or she chooses to permit the emergency interim successor to remain in the position until relieved. The administrative orders and ordinances shall not be inconsistent with this section.

This section applies to officers of all special districts and political subdivisions not included in subsection (4) of this section. The officers, subject to such administrative regulations as the executive head of the political subdivision promulgates, shall designate by title, if feasible, or by named person, emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession. The officer shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this section to ensure their current status. The officer shall designate a sufficient number of persons so that there will be not fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) deputies or emergency interim successors or any combination thereof at any time. If any officer of any political subdivision or any deputy provided for pursuant to law is unavailable, the powers of the office shall be exercised and duties shall be discharged by the designated emergency interim successors in the order specified. The emergency interim successor shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which designated until the time a vacancy which exists is filled in accordance with the Constitution or the KRS, or until the officer, a deputy, or a preceding emergency interim successor again becomes available to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

No person shall be designated or serve as an emergency interim successor unless he or she is eligible under the Constitution and statutes to hold the office to which he or she is designated to succeed, but no statutory provision prohibiting local or state officials from holding another office shall be applicable to an emergency interim successor.

Emergency interim successors shall take the oath required to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which they may succeed. No person, as a prerequisite to the exercise of the powers or discharge of the duties of an office to which he or she succeeds, shall be required to comply with any other provision of law relative to taking office.

Officials authorized to act as Governor pursuant to this section, and emergency interim successors are empowered to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office only during the continuance of an emergency. The General Assembly, by joint resolution, may at any time terminate the authority of the emergency interim successors to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of office.

Until the persons designated as emergency interim successors shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office in accordance with this section, the persons shall serve in their designated capacities at the pleasure of the designating authority.

Any dispute concerning a question of fact arising under this section with respect to an office in the executive division of the state government, except a dispute of fact relative to the office of Governor, shall be adjudicated by the Governor or other official authorized under the Constitution to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office of Governor, and the decision reached shall be final.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 55, effective July 15, 1998.

39D.050.
Preservation of essential state public records — Duties of Archives and Records Commission.

The state Archives and Records Commission shall establish a system for the preservation of essential state public records necessary for the continuity of governmental functions in the event of an emergency, disaster, or catastrophe. The commission shall:

Determine what records are essential for operation during a state of emergency and thereafter through consultation with all state cabinets, departments, and independent agencies and the administrator of state archives services and records, establish the manner in which the records shall be preserved, and provide for their preservation;

Require every state cabinet, department, and independent agency to establish and maintain a preservation program for essential state public records;

Provide for security storage of essential state records;

Furnish state cabinets, departments, and independent agencies with copies of the final plan for preservation of essential public records; and

Advise all political subdivisions of the Commonwealth on preservation of essential public records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 56, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Archives and Records Commission, KRS

171.420

.

39D.990.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated or order issued pursuant to this chapter for which another penalty is not specified shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 57, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor, KRS

532.090

.